Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB279.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1701(a) introductory paragraph and (2) of the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law, are amended and the subsection is amended by adding paragraphs to read:Section 1701. Submission and retention of contracts.(a) General rule.--Whenever any Commonwealth agency, legislative agency or judicial agency shall enter into any contract involving any property, real, personal or mixed of any kind or description or any contract for personal services where 12345678910111213141516171819202122 the consideration involved in the contract is [$5,000] $10,000 or more, a copy of the contract shall be filed with the Treasury Department within ten days after the contract is fully executed on behalf of the Commonwealth agency, legislative agency or judicial agency or otherwise becomes an obligation of the Commonwealth agency, legislative agency or judicial agency. The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to contracts for services protected by a privilege. The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to a purchase order evidencing fulfillment of an existing contract but shall apply to a purchase order evidencing new obligations. The following shall apply:* * *(2) The Treasury Department [may] shall require each Commonwealth agency, legislative agency or judicial agency to provide a summary with each contract, which shall include the following:(i) Date of execution.(ii) Amount of the contract.(iii) Beginning date of the contract.(iv) End date of the contract, if applicable.(v) Name of the agency entering into the contract.(vi) The name of all parties executing the contract.(vii) Subject matter of the contract.Each agency shall create and maintain the data under this paragraph in an ASCII-delimited text file, spreadsheet file or other file provided by Treasury Department regulation.(3) No later than every six months, the Treasury Department shall provide notice to each Commonwealth agency, legislative agency or judicial agency of each agency's 20250HB0279PN0227 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 obligations under this chapter. The Treasury Department shall provide the notice on or before January 15 and July 15 of each year.(4) Within ten days immediately after receipt of the notice from the Treasury Department under paragraph (3), each Commonwealth agency, legislative agency or judicial agency shall attest, on a form provided by the Treasury Department, that all copies of contracts required to be submitted and filed with the Treasury Department under this subsection have been submitted and filed as of the date of the attestation. The following shall apply to the attestation under this paragraph:(i) The Treasury Department shall make the attestation of each Commonwealth agency, legislative agency or judicial agency available for public inspection on the Treasury Department's publicly accessible Internet website in accordance with section 1702. (ii) The Treasury Department shall post a list of each Commonwealth agency, legislative agency or judicial agency which has failed to submit a completed attestation form within 30 days of receipt of the notice under paragraph (3).(5) If the Treasury Department determines that a Commonwealth agency, legislative agency or judicial agency has not submitted an attestation form under paragraph (4),the Treasury Department shall have the following duties:(i) Contact the agency to inform the agency that failure to comply with paragraph (4) may result in a delay or rejection of payment requests from the Treasury Department associated with the contract.20250HB0279PN0227 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) Provide a reasonable opportunity for the agency to submit and file a current attestation form with the Treasury Department.(6) If the Treasury Department determines that a Commonwealth agency, legislative agency or judicial agency has not filed a copy of a contract with the Treasury Department under this subsection, the Treasury Department may delay or withhold approval of a payment request associated with the contract from that agency until the contract is filed with the Treasury Department.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0279PN0227 - 4 - 123456789101112